Other/Precision Software/Precision Lang Suite/Editor/Extras/Hunspell/Dictionaries/la.aff
SFX r or      orique          or        
SFX r or      orine           or        
SFX r or      orive           or        
SFX r or      oreque          or        
SFX r or      orene           or        
SFX r or      oreve           or        
SFX r or      usque           or        
SFX r or      usne            or        
SFX r or      usve            or        
SFX r or      oresque         or        
SFX r or      oresne          or        
SFX r or      oresve          or        
SFX r or      orumque         or        
SFX r or      orumne          or        
SFX r or      orumve          or        
SFX r or      oribusque       or        
SFX r or      oribusne        or        
SFX r or      oribusve        or        
SFX r or      oraque          or        
SFX r or      orane           or        
SFX r or      orave           or        

SFX q Y 3
SFX q 0       que             .         
SFX q 0       ne              .         
SFX q 0       ve              .         
