Other/Precision Software/Precision Lang Suite/Editor/Extras/Hunspell/Dictionaries/la.dic
abessemus/q
abies/q
absimilis/fgrt
absurditas/q
abundus/abcr
Achilles/q
adeas/q
aderunt/q
adeundum/q
adfuturam/q
adiens/q
adiistis/q
aditis/q
adivero/q
admirator/q
adsumus/q
aemulatio/q
aes/q
afferantur/q
afferebatis/q
afferetur/q
afferres/q
affuere/q
aiebamus/q
albus/abcr
Alcmaeon/q
alios/q
alteratio/q
ambabus/q
ambos/q
Anchisiades/q
animans/q
antipodum/q
appetens/q
arcus/bhq
armis/q
Ascalonitae/q
assumptio/q
audacis/fgr
auferamini/q
auferebant/q
auferentur/q
auferrent/q
auferunt/q
avidus/abcr
axis/fq
Bastarnae/q
benignitas/q
biremis/fgq
Bovillarum/q
caecus/abcr
calamitas/q
calefiebas/q
calefio/q
cancellatim/q
capital/q
Carnutes/q
cautes/q
celeris/defgr
Celtiberorum/q
centurio/q
ceteris/q
cicatrix/q
circulariter/q
circumferebamini/q
circumferendo/q
circumferremini/q
circumferte/q
circunferar/q
circunferebatur/q
circunferimur/q
circunferret/q
citerior/qr
civitas/q
clima/q
coeas/q
coeperunt/q
coeunti/q
coibimus/q
coieris/q
coiitimus/q
coitur/q
coivissemus/q
collisio/q
commendatio/q
compes/q
complurium/q
concavus/abcr
condictio/q
conferatis/q
conferemur/q
confero/Bq
conferri/q
conformis/fgr
confutatio/q
conparatio/q
consimilis/fgrt
constructio/q
contradictio/q
convenientis/fgr
cornicen/q
cratis/fq
crebri/abcr
cruor/q
Cumarum/q
cunis/q
curvatus/abcr
Cyrenae/q
Danaos/q
debilis/fgqr
decere/q
decimaquarta/q
decimesexte/q
decimorumoctavorum/q
decimusnonus/q
dedecebit/q
deerant/q
deessetis/q
deferantur/q
deferebatis/q
deferetur/q
deferres/q
deformitas/q
delphin/q
denominatio/q
depressus/r
desis/q
deterior/qr
deversitor/q
dexteri/abcr
dieses/q
differat/q
differemus/q
differor/q
differris/q
difficilis/fgqrt
dimensio/q
directus/abcr
disgregatio/q
distinctus/abcr
distributio/q
diversus/abcr
dodrans/q
duas/q
dulcedo/q
eae/q
ecca/q
ede/q
educatio/q
efferebamini/q
efferendo/q
efferremini/q
efferte/q
ei/q
elementis/q
enclima/q
epigramma/q
erat/q
erectus/abcr
Esquiliis/q
est/q
eunti/q
excelsus/abcr
excubias/q
exequias/q
exeunt/q
exieram/q
exiissemus/q
exilis/fgqr
exirent/q
exiveramus/q
exivisse/q
expeditus/abcr
explanatio/q
expressus/abcr
extensio/q
extensus/abcr
exterior/qr
facilis/fgqrt
facinus/q
faucibus/q
felicis/defgrt
feralis/fgq
ferebamur/q
ferens/q
fero/q
ferret/q
fiam/q
fiebatis/q
fimus/q
flexibilis/fgr
flumen/q
fornix/q
frigus/q
fructuosus/abcr
funalis/fgq
fuscus/abcr
fusus/abcr
Gabiis/q
gens/q
gradatim/q
grandis/fgqr
Gutuater/q
hanc/q
helix/q
Hernicos/q
hirundo/q
honestus/abcr
horribilis/fgq
humor/q
ianitor/q
ibunt/q
ieram/q
iidem/q
iitit/q
illustratus/abcr
imago/q
immanis/fgqr
immortalitas/q
impotens/q
incolumis/fgq
incunctabilis/fgq
indoles/q
ineptiae/q
inerrabilis/fgq
inest/q
inextricabilis/fgq
inferat/q
inferemus/q
inferimini/q
inferior/qr
inferres/q
infitiator/q
inibamus/q
inieratis/q
iniisset/q
iniquus/abcr
iniret/q
iniverim/q
inivistis/q
inquisitio/q
insignis/fgqr
insimus/q
insumus/q
intentus/abcr
intereant/q
intererit/q
intereundi/q
interfuturam/q
interieram/q
interiissent/q
interior/qr
interire/q
interiverat/q
interivisti/q
intersint/q
intolerabilis/fgqr
introeat/q
introibant/q
introierat/q
introiisti/q
introite/q
introiverit/q
inundatio/q
ipsa/q
ipsorum/q
irreparabilis/fgq
iucunditas/q
iunior/qr
iveram/q
ivissent/q
labes/q
lamentatio/q
largitio/q
laus/q
lepus/q
libet/q
licere/q
lineator/q
liquefiemus/q
liquefit/q
lubet/q
lucidus/abcr
Maecenas/q
maior/qr
malebas/q
mallemus/q
manubiae/q
marium/q
maturus/abcr
mavis/q
meditatio/q
melior/qr
memineram/q
meministis/q
me/q
millibus/q
minor/qr
missio/q
mitis/fgqr
mixtus/abcr
moles/q
mollis/fgqrt
Mostenis/q
multipotens/q
mutabilitas/q
natalis/fgq
neglegens/q
nequeunt/q
nequieramus/q
nequiitimus/q
nequiveram/q
nequivissent/q
nervosus/abcr
Nestor/q
noctu/q
nolint/q
nolunt/q
nonnihil/q
notabilis/fgqrt
novies/q
numen/q
numerosus/abcr
obeo/q
obessent/q
obeuntia/q
obibat/q
obierimus/q
obiitierunt/q
obit/q
obivi/q
obliquatio/q
obsumus/q
octingenti/q
offeramini/q
offerebant/q
offerentur/q
offerrent/q
offerunt/q
oportebat/q
opsessor/q
orgiis/q
ovis/fq
parens/q
patefiant/q
patefieretis/q
paucas/q
pegma/q
peior/qr
perangustus/abcr
pereas/q
pereuntis/q
perferebamini/q
perferendo/q
perferremini/q
perferte/q
peribat/q
perierimus/q
perimus/q
perite/q
periveritis/q
perlevis/fgq
Persae/q
perspicacius/abcr
pertranseundi/q
pertransiens/q
pertransiisse/q
pertransisse/q
pertransiverit/q
perversitas/q
Philon/q
piper/q
Pleiades/q
plus/q
populator/q
posses/q
posterior/r
postis/fq
poterunt/q
potior/qr
praecordiis/q
praeerunt/q
praeferam/q
praeferebantur/q
praefereris/q
praeferrentur/q
praeferuntur/q
praepinguis/fgq
praesul/q
praetereunte/q
praeteribitis/q
praeterierit/q
praeteri/q
praeteriveramus/q
praeterivisse/q
precem/q
prior/qr
privatio/q
prodeant/q
proderunt/q
prodeundum/q
prodibimus/q
prodierint/q
prodire/q
prodiveratis/q
prodivisset/q
proferar/q
proferebatur/q
proferimur/q
proferret/q
profuturus/q
propinquitas/q
propior/qr
proprius/abcr
prosint/q
pudor/q
pulchri/abcr
puls/q
pyxis/q
quadringenta/q
qualis/fgq
quantumcunque/q
quarumvis/q
queat/q
quibimus/q
quierim/q
quietus/abcr
quiisti/q
quindenas/q
quingentas/q
quinquagesimisoctavis/q
quintisdecimis/q
quis/q
quiverimus/q
quivistis/q
quovis/q
rebuspublicis/q
redeas/q
redeuntium/q
redieramus/q
rediisse/q
rediretis/q
rediverim/q
redivistis/q
referatis/q
referemur/q
refero/Bq
referri/q
refertus/abcr
regressio/q
remissus/abcr
repercussio/q
rete/q
rigor/q
rudens/q
sacomata/q
saepior/r
sagacis/fgr
salutator/q
sapientis/fgr
Saracenorum/q
satisfiebamus/q
satisfiet/q
saturi/abcr
scalis/q
securis/fq
segnis/fgqr
seipsa/q
semihians/q
Senones/q
septentrionalis/fgqr
septentrio/q
Sequanos/q
sescenta/q
sexagenas/q
sexagesimequarte/q
sexcentae/q
Sicanis/q
similis/fgqrt
simulatio/q
sinistri/abcr
sinistrorsum/q
solam/q
solum/q
sparsim/q
spissus/abcr
squalor/q
stipes/q
suasor/q
suberat/q
subestis/q
subferamini/q
subferebant/q
subferentur/q
subferrent/q
subferunt/q
subibit/q
subiero/q
subirem/q
subiverant/q
subivisses/q
sublimis/fgqr
subsit/q
Sugambri/q
sunt/q
supererit/q
superferamini/q
superferebant/q
superferentur/q
superferrent/q
superferunt/q
superior/qr
supersitis/q
suptilitas/q
tabes/q
talis/fgq
Temnii/q
tenor/q
ter/q
Teutonos/q
Thraex/q
Topicis/q
tractatio/q
transeundo/q
transferantur/q
transferebatis/q
transferetur/q
transferres/q
transibas/q
transierim/q
transiret/q
transiverint/q
transivitimus/q
trecentas/q
tremefiebant/q
tremefimus/q
trias/q
trigemini/q
trigesimumsecundum/q
tripus/q
tui/q
turtur/q
ulla/q
ulterior/qr
umbrosus/abcr
unctio/q
unguedo/q
universalis/fgrt
usurpatio/q
utrarum/q
vacillatio/q
varietas/q
vectigalis/fgq
velletis/q
venter/q
Vergiliarum/q
vestrummet/q
veteris/der
vices/q
Vindelici/q
virgultis/q
Vitellio/q
voles/q
Vonones/q
Zeno/q
